Illinois, session 104th, HB187.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Adult Protective Services Act is amended by 5changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (320 ILCS 20/4)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6604)7    Sec. 4. Reports of abuse, abandonment, or neglect. 8    (a) Any person who suspects the the abuse, abandonment, 9neglect, financial exploitation, or self-neglect of an 10eligible adult may report this suspicion or information about 11the suspicious death of an eligible adult to an agency 12designated to receive such reports under this Act or to the 13Department.14    (a-5) If any mandated reporter has reason to believe that 15an eligible adult, who because of a disability or other 16condition or impairment is unable to seek assistance for 17himself or herself, has, within the previous 12 months, been 18subjected to abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial 19exploitation, the mandated reporter shall, within 24 hours 20after developing such belief, report this suspicion to an 21agency designated to receive such reports under this Act or to 22the Department. The agency designated to receive such reports 23under this Act or the Department may establish a manner in   HB0187- 2 -LRB104 03591 KTG 13615 b1which a mandated reporter can make the required report through 2an Internet reporting tool. Information sent and received 3through the Internet reporting tool is subject to the same 4rules in this Act as other types of confidential reporting 5established by the designated agency or the Department. 6Whenever a mandated reporter is required to report under this 7Act in his or her capacity as a member of the staff of a 8medical or other public or private institution, facility, or 9agency, he or she shall make a report to an agency designated 10to receive such reports under this Act or to the Department in 11accordance with the provisions of this Act and may also notify 12the person in charge of the institution, facility, or agency 13or his or her designated agent that the report has been made. 14Under no circumstances shall any person in charge of such 15institution, facility, or agency, or his or her designated 16agent to whom the notification has been made, exercise any 17control, restraint, modification, or other change in the 18report or the forwarding of the report to an agency designated 19to receive such reports under this Act or to the Department. 20The privileged quality of communication between any 21professional person required to report and his or her patient 22or client shall not apply to situations involving abused, 23abandoned, neglected, or financially exploited eligible adults 24and shall not constitute grounds for failure to report as 25required by this Act.26    (a-6) If a mandated reporter has reason to believe that   HB0187- 3 -LRB104 03591 KTG 13615 b1the death of an eligible adult may be the result of abuse or 2neglect, the matter shall be reported to an agency designated 3to receive such reports under this Act or to the Department for 4subsequent referral to the appropriate law enforcement agency 5and the coroner or medical examiner in accordance with 6subsection (c-5) of Section 3 of this Act. 7    (a-7) A person making a report under this Act in the belief 8that it is in the alleged victim's best interest shall be 9immune from criminal or civil liability or professional 10disciplinary action on account of making the report, 11notwithstanding any requirements concerning the 12confidentiality of information with respect to such eligible 13adult which might otherwise be applicable.14    (a-9) Law enforcement officers shall continue to report 15incidents of alleged abuse pursuant to the Illinois Domestic 16Violence Act of 1986, notwithstanding any requirements under 17this Act.18    (b) Any person, institution or agency participating in the 19making of a report, providing information or records related 20to a report, assessment, or services, or participating in the 21investigation of a report under this Act in good faith, or 22taking photographs or x-rays as a result of an authorized 23assessment, shall have immunity from any civil, criminal or 24other liability in any civil, criminal or other proceeding 25brought in consequence of making such report or assessment or 26on account of submitting or otherwise disclosing such   HB0187- 4 -LRB104 03591 KTG 13615 b1photographs or x-rays to any agency designated to receive 2reports of alleged or suspected abuse, abandonment, or 3neglect. Any person, institution or agency authorized by the 4Department to provide assessment, intervention, or 5administrative services under this Act shall, in the good 6faith performance of those services, have immunity from any 7civil, criminal or other liability in any civil, criminal, or 8other proceeding brought as a consequence of the performance 9of those services. For the purposes of any civil, criminal, or 10other proceeding, the good faith of any person required to 11report, permitted to report, or participating in an 12investigation of a report of alleged or suspected abuse, 13abandonment, neglect, financial exploitation, or self-neglect 14shall be presumed.15    (c) The identity of a person making a report of alleged or 16suspected abuse, abandonment, neglect, financial exploitation, 17or self-neglect or a report concerning information about the 18suspicious death of an eligible adult under this Act may be 19disclosed by the Department or other agency provided for in 20this Act only with such person's written consent or by court 21order, but is otherwise confidential.22    (d) The Department shall by rule establish a system for 23filing and compiling reports made under this Act.24    (e) Any physician who willfully fails to report as 25required by this Act shall be referred to the Illinois State 26Medical Disciplinary Board for action in accordance with   HB0187- 5 -LRB104 03591 KTG 13615 b1subdivision (A)(22) of Section 22 of the Medical Practice Act 2of 1987. Any dentist or dental hygienist who willfully fails 3to report as required by this Act shall be referred to the 4Department of Financial and Professional Regulation for 5possible disciplinary action. Any optometrist who willfully 6fails to report as required by this Act shall be referred to 7the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation for 8action in accordance with paragraph (15) of subsection (a) of 9Section 24 of the Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987. 10Any other mandated reporter required by this Act to report 11suspected abuse, abandonment, neglect, or financial 12exploitation who willfully fails to report the same is guilty 13of a Class A misdemeanor.14(Source: P.A. 102-244, eff. 1-1-22; 103-329, eff. 1-1-24; 15103-626, eff. 1-1-25.)